tests/qst-position.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] invisible copula":
    öğrenci<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : öğrencisin
    öğrenci<n><nom>+mi<qst>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : öğrenci misin
    öğrenci<n><nom>+i<cop><past><p2><sg> : öğrenciydin
    öğrenci<n><nom>+mi<qst>+i<cop><past><p2><sg> : öğrenci miyin

  "[lexc] some non-eyewitness past-tense verb forms":
    öğren<v><tv><evid><p2><sg> : öğrenmişsin
    öğren<v><tv><evid><p2><sg>+mi<qst> : öğrenmiş misin

  "[lexc] some eyewitness past-tense verb forms":
    öğren<v><tv><past><p2><sg> : öğrendin
    öğren<v><tv><past><p2><sg>+mi<qst> : öğrendin mi
